Tennessee statutes. Title 30 Administration of Estates
Part 1

General Provisions

30-1-101. Letters testamentary or of administration required.

No person shall presume to enter upon the administration of any deceased person's estate until the person has obtained letters of administration or letters testamentary.

Code 1858, § 2201 (deriv. Acts 1715, ch. 48, § 4); Shan., § 3933; Code 1932, § 8143; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-101.

Cross-References. Administrators ad litem, § 30-1-109.

Appointment of administrator at request of commissioner of revenue, § 67-8-405.

Bond required, § 30-1-201.

Definitions in § 31-1-101 applicable to this title, § 30-1-150.

“Executor” defined, § 1-3-105.

Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, chapter 16, part 2.

Next of kin suing for debts due decedent's estate in their own names, § 30-2-714.

Public administrators, guardians, and trustees, title 30, ch. 1, part 4.

“Representative” defined, § 1-3-105.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 33, 34, 489, 493, 521, 535.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-703, 4-706, 4-804.

Law Reviews.

Attorney v. Client — Privity, Malpractice, and the Lack of Respect for the Primacy of the Attorney-Client Relationship in Estate Planning, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 261 (2001).

Confused by tax reforms? Follow these 10 key rules for better estate planning in Tennessee (Dan W. Holbrook), 37 No. 8 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2001).

Ethics — Petty v. Privette: Exclusion of Attorney Liability in the Area of Estate Administration, 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 687 (1993).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: A Fresh Look at State Asset Protection Trust Statutes, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1741 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Federalizing Principles of Donative Intent and Unanticipated Circumstances, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1931 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Is Federalization of Charity Law All Bad? What States Can Learn from the Internal Revenue Code, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1621 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, The Stored Communications Act and Digital Assets, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1729 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Destructive Federal Preemption of State Wealth Transfer Law in Beneficiary Designation Cases: Hillman Doubles Down on Egelhoff, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1665 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Disclaimers and Federalism, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1871 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Federal Visions of Private Family Support, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1835 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: In Search of the Probate Exception, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1533 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Probate Law Meets the Digital Age, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1697 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: The Creeping Federalization of Wealth-Transfer Law, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1635 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Unconstitutional Perpetual Trusts, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1769 (2014).

30-1-102. Jurisdiction to grant letters.

Letters of administration shall be granted by the probate court of the county where the intestate had usual residence at the time of the intestate's death, or, in case the intestate had fixed places of residence in more than one county, the probate court of either county may grant letters of administration upon the intestate's estate.

Code 1858, § 2202 (deriv. Acts 1777 (Nov.), ch. 2, § 62; 1789, ch. 23, § 1; 1794, ch. 1, § 47); Shan., § 3934; mod. Code 1932, § 8144; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-102.

Cross-References. Chancery court authorized to grant letters after lapse of six months, § 30-1-301.

Duties of clerk, § 18-6-106.

Fees of clerks of courts administering probate matters, §§ 8-21-401, 8-21-701, 8-21-702.

Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, chapter 16, part 2.

Place of granting letters testamentary, § 32-2-101.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 34, 538, 572.

30-1-103. Nonresident decedents — Granting letters testamentary or of administration.

Letters testamentary or of administration may be granted upon the estate of a person who resided, at the time of the person's death, in some other state or territory of the union, or in a foreign country, by the probate court of any county in this state:

Where the deceased had any goods, chattels, or assets, or any estate, real or personal, at the time of the person's death, or where the goods, chattels, assets, or estate may be when the letters are applied for;

Where any debtor of the deceased resides;

Where any debtor of a debtor of the deceased resides, the debt being unpaid when the application is made; or

Where any suit is to be brought, prosecuted, or defended, in which the estate is interested.

In the case of subdivision (a)(4):

If the suit is pending, or to be brought, in a chancery court composed of more than one county, the probate court of any one of the counties may grant the letters; and

If the suit is pending in an appellate court, the letters shall be granted by the probate court of the county in which the suit originated.

Code 1858, §§ 2203-2205 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2; 1841-1842, ch. 69, § 1; 1841-1842, ch. 165, § 1); Shan., §§ 3935-3937; Code 1932, §§ 8145-8147; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-103 — 30-105.

Cross-References. Administrators ad litem, appointment, § 30-1-109.

Executors of foreign wills qualifying, § 32-5-102.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 58, 63, 64, 572.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, §§ 2, 4; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 57; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 10.

Law Reviews.

Wrongful Death Action in Tennessee (T.A. Smedley), 29 Tenn. L. Rev. 447.

Attorney General Opinions. Filing bonds by nonresident fiduciaries, OAG 84-195, 1984 Tenn. AG LEXIS 143 (6/27/84).

30-1-104. Service of process upon nonresident representative.

Whenever a nonresident of the state qualifies in this state as the executor or administrator of a person dying in or leaving assets or property in this state, for the purpose of suing or being sued, or for the purpose of being cited or otherwise notified by the court in which the decedent's estate is being administered, the nonresident shall be deemed to have assented to be treated as a resident citizen of this state.

In case it is desired by any citizen or resident of this state to sue the administrator or executor in the administrator's or executor's official capacity for any debt or demand, due or owing to any citizen or resident of this state, from the testator or intestate, then, in case of the inability of the officer in whose hands process is placed to find the administrator or executor in this state, notice of the suit, served upon the clerk of the probate court of the county in which the party qualified as administrator or executor, shall be sufficient notice to bring the administrator or executor before the court issuing the process; provided, that the clerk shall notify by United States registered return-receipt mail the executor or administrator of notice having been served upon the clerk.

The nonresident of the state, qualifying as executor or administrator as aforementioned, shall give to the clerk of the probate court of the county in which the nonresident qualifies the nonresident's address, and a letter so mailed to the nonresident at that address shall be sufficient notice, unless subsequently changed and notice accordingly given to the probate court clerk, in which event notice to the changed address, shall be sufficient.

Acts 1903, ch. 501, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 3937a1, 3937a2; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8148, 8149; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-106, 30-107; Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that the amendment to this section by that act shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998, and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

Cross-References. Appointment of nonresident executor, § 30-1-116.

Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Executors of foreign wills qualifying, § 32-5-102.

Limitations on appointment of nonresident fiduciary, § 35-50-107.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 44, 124.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 58, 60, 62, 545, 701.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 36; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, §§ 91, 120.

Law Reviews.

Selection and Removal of Fiduciaries (Robert L. McMurray), 26 No. 3, Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

30-1-105. Recording of letters — Validity of certified copy.

All letters testamentary and of administration, when granted by the probate court, shall be recorded in that court, and a certified copy of the record shall be of the same validity as the original letters granted.

Code 1858, § 2206 (deriv. Acts 1837-1838, ch. 125, § 7); Shan., § 3938; mod. Code 1932, § 8150; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-108.

Cross-References. Record of letters testamentary, § 18-6-110.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 587.

30-1-106. Preference in granting of letters.

When any person dies intestate in this state, administration shall be granted to the spouse of that person, if the spouse makes application for administration. For want of application for administration upon the part of the spouse, the administration shall be granted to the next of kin, if such next of kin apply for it. If neither the spouse nor next of kin make application for administration, then administration shall be granted to a creditor proving the decedent's debt on oath before the probate court; provided, that when there is more than one next of kin, the probate court may decide which of the kin shall be entitled to the administration.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 36, § 1; Shan., § 3939; Code 1932, § 8151; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-109; Acts 2002, ch. 735, § 2.

Cross-References. Public administrators and public guardians, when granted to, § 30-1-405.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 432.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 546, 547, 549, 552, 554, 566, 569, 571, 1052.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-708.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, VII. Appellate Review of the Disposition (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 366 (1979).

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

30-1-107. Appeal from grant of letters.

Any person who claims a right to execute a will, or to administer on the estate of an intestate, and who thinks that person to be injured by an order of the court awarding letters testamentary or of administration, may appeal to the appropriate court in accordance with § 30-2-609, on giving bond as in other cases of appeal.

After the appropriate court has heard such appeal and a determination is made, the judgment shall be certified to the probate court, that it may proceed in the case accordingly.

Code 1858, §§ 2207, 2208 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 48); Shan., §§ 3940, 3941; Code 1932, §§ 8152, 8153; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-110, 30-111; Acts 1988, ch. 854, § 3.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 555.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, VII. Appellate Review of the Disposition (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 366 (1979).

30-1-108. Administrator pendente lite.

The probate judges are authorized to appoint an administrator pendente lite in any case that may arise in their respective courts where any will may be the subject of contest or litigation.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 62; Shan., § 3942; mod. Code 1932, § 8154; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-112.

Cross-References. Administrators ad litem, appointment, § 30-1-109.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 349, 567.

30-1-109. Administrator ad litem.

In all proceedings in the probate or chancery courts, or any other court having chancery jurisdiction, where the estate of a deceased person must be represented, and there is no executor or administrator of the estate, or the executor or administrator of the estate is interested adversely to the estate, it shall be the duty of the judge or chancellor of the court, in which the proceeding is had, to appoint an administrator ad litem of the estate for the particular proceeding, and without requiring a bond of the administrator ad litem, except in a case where it becomes necessary for the administrator ad litem to take control and custody of property or assets of the intestate's estate, when the administrator ad litem shall execute a bond, with good security, as other administrators are required to give, in such amounts as the chancellor or judge may order, before taking control and custody of the property or assets.

This appointment shall be made whenever the facts rendering it necessary appear in the record of such a case, or shall be made known to the court by the affidavit of any person interested in the case; and, in such proceedings in the chancery court, the chancellor at chambers or clerk and master of the court on a rule day shall have authority to make an appointment in vacation.

Acts 1889, ch. 137, § 1; Shan., § 3954; mod. Code 1932, § 8166; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-312.

Cross-References. Administrator pendente lite, appointment, § 30-1-108.

Resignation of representative, appointment of successor, § 30-1-112.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 45, 572, 577.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-711, 4-712.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1978).

30-1-110. Time within which administration may be granted.

The time within which administration may be granted shall be as follows:

Deceased Entitled to Remainder Not Reduced to Possession. Where a person dies entitled to a vested or contingent remainder, not reduced to possession in the deceased's lifetime, ten (10) years after the termination of the life or other particular estate on which the remainder depends, letters shall be given to administer upon the deceased's estate in the remainder.

Distributee under Disability at Death of Ancestor. Administration may be granted at any time within twenty-two (22) years from the death of the deceased to any person entitled to distribution who was an infant when the deceased died.

Prosecuting Claims Against Government. A special administration may be granted for the purpose of prosecuting any claim against the government of the United States, without any limitation of time.

Code 1858, § 2220 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 24, § 3; 1835-1836, ch. 86, § 3; 1841-1842, ch. 69, § 2; 1853-1854, ch. 98, § 1); Shan., § 3955; mod. Code 1932, § 8167; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-113; Acts 1993, ch. 449, § 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 316, 352, 528, 540, 563, 572.

30-1-111. Oath of representative.

The clerk shall, before delivering the letters of administration or letters testamentary to the personal representative, administer to the representative, if an executor, an oath for performing the will of the deceased; and, if an administrator, an oath for the faithful performance of the administrator's duty; and, as to both, an oath that all statements in the petition about the representative are true and accurate and the representative is not disqualified from serving because of having been sentenced to imprisonment in a penitentiary as set forth in § 40-20-115 or otherwise. In the alternative, the oaths of the administrator or executor may be sworn or affirmed in the presence of a notary public and the acknowledgment of the representative's oaths, when certified by the notary public, shall be presented to the appropriate clerk.

Code 1858, § 2221 (deriv. Acts 1715, ch. 48, § 5); Shan., § 3956; Code 1932, § 8168; Acts 1983, ch. 55, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-114; Acts 2019, ch. 332, § 2.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “personal” preceding “representative” near the beginning; substituted “; and, as to both, an oath that all statements in the petition about the representative are true and accurate and the representative is not disqualified from serving because of having been sentenced to imprisonment in a penitentiary as set forth in § 40-20-115 or otherwise. In the alternative, the oaths” for “. In the alternative, the oath” in the middle of the section and substituted “oaths” for “oath” near the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 332, § 3. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. “Oath” defined, § 1-3-105.

Service of process upon nonresident representative, § 30-1-104.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 33, 521, 581.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-707, 4-805.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

30-1-112. Resignation of representative.

Any named executor in a decedent's last will and testament may decline to serve as such personal representative by filing a sworn statement, or a statement under penalty of perjury, with the court.

Any personal representative may resign and relinquish trust in the following manner:

Filing Petition. The personal representative shall file the petition in the probate court or chancery court having cognizance of the settlement of the estate of the deceased whom the petitioner represents, praying to be permitted to resign.

Notice to Legatees, etc. When the legatees, devisees, or distributees entitled to the estate reside in the county where the letters testamentary or of administration were granted, five (5) days' notice shall be given them, their agent or attorney, of the filing or intention to file, the petition. Where they reside out of the county, the court shall order notice to be given by publication in a newspaper, or by posting at the courthouse door, or in such other mode as it thinks reasonable.

Petitioner to Settle Accounts — New Administrator. After notice has been given, the court shall cause the petitioner's accounts to be settled, and may, at its discretion, accept the resignation of the petitioner, and appoint a new administrator, taking from the appointee a good and sufficient administration bond.

Code 1858, § 2237 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 141, §§ 1, 2); Shan., § 3973; Code 1932, § 8185; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-115; Acts 2016, ch. 809, §§ 4, 5.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (a); and substituted “personal representative” for “executor or administrator” in the present introductory language of (b) and in (b)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 809, § 8. April 14, 2016.

Cross-References. Removal on sentence to penitentiary, § 40-20-115.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 45, 604-606.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-901 — 4-903.

30-1-113. Estate turned over to new administrator — Inventory.

The court shall order the petitioner to pay over and deliver to the new personal representative the balance of money, property, and effects in the petitioner's hands; and, unless the payment and delivery are made in pursuance of the order, the court may order an execution against the petitioner and the petitioner's sureties, after giving five (5) days' notice to the sureties.

Within one (1) month from the time of appointment, the new representative shall make and duly file a true and perfect inventory of the estate of the deceased that comes to the representative's hands.

Code 1858, §§ 2238, 2239 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 141, §§ 3, 4); Shan., §§ 3974, 3975; Code 1932, §§ 8186, 8187; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-116, 30-117.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 607, 608, 662, 986.

Law Reviews.

Attorney and Client — Liability of Attorney for Misdirection of Minor's Funds, 8 Tenn. L. Rev. 191 (1930).

30-1-114. Transfer of administration to new county.

Any person interested in an administration may have the administration transferred to a new county formed after it was granted, and including the residence of the deceased, by filing, in the clerk's office of the new county, a transcript, duly certified, of the proceedings already had in the administration, after which the administration shall be conducted as if the letters had been granted in the new county. But without so filing a transcript, the probate court of the new county, or its clerk, can do nothing in the administration.

The fees paid to the clerk of the old county for the transcript, by the party procuring it, shall be chargeable to the estate.

Code 1858, §§ 2235, 2236 (Acts 1851-1852, ch. 149, §§ 1, 2, 4-6); Shan., §§ 3971, 3972; Code 1932, §§ 8183, 8184; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-401, 30-402.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 609.

30-1-115. Administrator with will annexed — Powers and authority.

An administrator with the will annexed, appointed instead of an executor resigned, and all administrators with the will annexed, shall have the same power and authority as the executor had by the will of the testator, and may sell land, if the executor possessed that power.

Code 1858, § 2240 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 141, § 4); Shan., § 3976; Code 1932, § 8188; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-118.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 33, 561, 986.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-708 — 4-710.

Law Reviews.

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

30-1-116. Appointment of nonresident personal representative.

No nonresident person, bank or trust company may be appointed as the personal representative of an estate of a decedent, except as provided in § 35-50-107.

Acts 1985, ch. 312, § 1; 1988, ch. 854, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Selection and Removal of Fiduciaries (Robert L. McMurray), 26 No. 3, Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

30-1-117. Petition and documents required to be filed with application for letters.

To apply for letters of administration or letters testamentary to administer the estate of a decedent, a verified petition containing the following information and documents shall be filed with the court:

The identity of the petitioner;

The decedent's name, age, if known, date and place of death, and residence at time of death;

In case of intestacy, the name, age, if known, mailing address and relationship of each heir at law of the decedent;

A statement that the decedent died intestate or the date of execution, if known, and the names of all attesting witnesses of the document or documents offered for probate;

The document or documents offered for probate, or a copy thereof, as an exhibit to the petition;

The names and relationships of the devisees and legatees and the city of residence of each if known, similar information for those who otherwise would be entitled to the decedent's property under the statutes of intestate succession, and the identification of any minor or other person under disability;

An estimate of the fair market value of the estate to be administered, unless bond is waived by the document offered for probate or is waived as authorized by statute;

If there is a document, whether the document offered for probate waives the filing of any inventory and accounting or whether such is not otherwise required by law;

If there is a document, a statement that the petitioner is not aware of any instrument revoking the document being offered for probate, if that is the case, and that the petitioner believes that the document being offered for probate is the decedent's last will; and

The name, age, mailing address, relationship of the proposed personal representative to the decedent, a statement of any felony or misdemeanor convictions, and a statement of any sentence of imprisonment in a penitentiary.

No notice of the probate proceeding shall be required except for probate in solemn form, which shall require due notice in the manner provided by law to all persons interested.

Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 1; 2019, ch. 332, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that this section shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998, and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (a)(10).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 332, § 3. May 10, 2019.

30-1-118 — 30-1-149.
[Reserved.]

The definitions in § 31-1-101 are applicable to this title, unless a different meaning is indicated in a section or is otherwise clearly intended.

Acts 1988, ch. 854, § 5.

30-1-151. Procedure for removal.

Any executor or administrator may be removed in accordance with the procedures in § 35-15-706.

Acts 2002, ch. 735, § 3; 2005, ch. 99, § 1.